test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-armtwb_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - armtõb: # adjectives 159 'eng /est rahuldav/fin' - full paradigm
     armtõb+A+Sg+Nom: armtõb
     armtõb+A+Sg+Gen: armtõb
     armtõb+A+Sg+Par: armtõbt
     armtõb+A+Sg+Dat: armtõbõn
     armtõb+A+Sg+Ins: armtõbõks
     armtõb+A+Sg+Ill: armtõbõ
     armtõb+A+Sg+Ela: armtõbst
     armtõb+A+Pl+Nom: armtõbõd
     armtõb+A+Pl+Gen: armtõbõd
     armtõb+A+Pl+Par: armtõbidi
     armtõb+A+Pl+Dat: armtõbõdõn
     armtõb+A+Pl+Ins: armtõbõdõks
     armtõb+A+Pl+Ill: armtõbiž
     armtõb+A+Pl+Ela: armtõbist
